California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) Notice of intention to petition the superior court for judicial review shall be filed by the applicant or applicants with the supervisor within 60 days after the entry of the final order complained of or within 60 days following the final disposition of any application for rehearing. The notice must identify the order and state the grounds of objection thereto. Immediately upon the filing of such notice the supervisor shall certify to the applicant or applicants the estimated cost of preparing the transcript of the proceedings before the supervisor. The amount of the estimated cost shall be deposited with the supervisor within 10 days after the mailing of the certification of such cost to the applicant or applicants. Upon the deposit of the cost the supervisor shall order the preparation of the transcript. A certified copy of the transcript shall be delivered to the applicant or applicants within 60 days from the date of the filing of said notice of intention unless such time is extended for good cause by the supervisor, but in no event later than 90 days from the date of filing of such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3334.

The pendency of actions before the superior court or proceedings for review before any other court of competent jurisdiction of itself shall not stay or suspend the operation of any order; however, the superior court or such other court in its discretion, upon its own motion or upon proper application of any party thereto, may, for good cause, stay or suspend, in whole or in part, the operation of any order pending consideration or review thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3335.

If an action for judicial review has not been commenced within the time prescribed for such action, or, if filed, the time within which to process an appeal by the petitioner from any judgment or order rendered therein has expired, or if such an appeal has been timely perfected and there has been an affirmance of such judgment or order, the supervisor may order that the production by noncomplying owners or operators of oil or gas from any pool or pools or portions thereof cease or be curtailed until such noncomplying owners or operators comply with said unit order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3336.

The supervisor upon his own motion may, or shall upon the application of any interested person, hold a public hearing for the purpose of determining and establishing the exterior boundaries encompassing the lands referred to in Section 3317. If, after a public hearing and from the evidence adduced therefrom, the supervisor determines that the lands, or a portion thereof, come within the category of those lands referred to in Section 3317, he shall adopt an order fixing and establishing the exterior boundaries thereof. The supervisor shall retain jurisdiction in this regard, and shall, if it be made to appear necessary, hold further hearings for the purpose of determining whether the boundaries previously established should be enlarged or otherwise altered. Any such change or alteration in said boundaries shall be made by order of the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3337.

The division shall exercise surveillance over all repressuring operations in the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1049.)
-------------------------------------------

3341.

At the termination of oil and gas production from a unit area established or approved pursuant to this article and the abandonment of attempts to obtain production therefrom, any interested municipal corporation or other public agency may acquire by eminent domain, in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of property for public use by the state, municipal corporation or other public agency, such oil production properties or facilities within the unit area as such municipal corporation or other public agency may deem necessary or essential to the maintenance of such pressures as will continue to arrest or ameliorate subsidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

3342.

To the extent necessary to conform to the provisions and requirements of this article, and to any order of unitization or other order, rule or regulation of the supervisor, made and adopted pursuant hereto, all leases, contracts, and all other rights and obligations shall be regarded as modified and amended, but otherwise to remain in full force and effect. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to extend the term of any lease or other agreement.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to require a transfer to or vesting in the unit operator, or in persons other than those owning the same at the time of the creation of the unit, of title to the separately owned tracts or to any leases or other drilling and operating agreements thereon within the unit area, other than the right to use and operate the same to the extent set out in the order of unitization; nor shall the unit operator or the working interest owners jointly be regarded as owning the unit production. Each respective share of the unit production and the proceeds from the sale thereof shall be severally owned by the persons to whom the same is allocated pursuant to the order of unitization. All property, whether real or personal, which the unit operator may in any way acquire, hold or possess, the cost of which is chargeable to the working interest owners, shall not be acquired, held or possessed for the unit operator for his own account but shall be so acquired, held and possessed by the unit operator for the account of and as agent for each of the several working interest owners and shall be the property of each of such persons as their respective interests may appear under the order of unitization, subject, however, to the right of the unit operator to the possession, management, use or disposal of the same in the proper conduct of the affairs of the unit, and subject to any lien the unit operator may have thereon to secure the payment of unit expense.

No unit order made by the supervisor shall be construed to have the effect of, result in, or in any manner require or provide for the alienation, transfer, conveyance or change of any title or ownership, whether legal or equitable, of any person in or to any separately owned tract of land included in the said order, or to the mineral rights therein, to any other person owning or possessing a separately owned tract of land which may likewise be included in said unit order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3343.

(a) Any person who willfully violates any provision of this article or any rule, regulation or order of the supervisor, shall be subject to a penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each act of violation and for each day that the violation continues.

(b) The penalty provided in this section shall be recoverable by suit filed by the Attorney General in the name and on behalf of the supervisor in the superior court of the State of California for the county in which the defendant resides, or in which any defendant resides, if there is more than one defendant, or in the superior court of any county in which the violation occurred. The payment of the penalty shall not operate to relieve a person on whom the penalty is imposed from liability to any other person for damages arising out of the violation. The penalty, when recovered, shall be paid to the State Treasurer and shall be deposited to the credit of the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund.

(c) Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other person in the violation of any provision of this article, or any rule, regulation or order of the supervisor shall be subject to the same penalty as that prescribed by this section for the violation by the other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 14.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3344.

(a) Whenever it appears that any person is violating or threatening to violate any provision of this article, or any rule, regulation or order of the supervisor, the supervisor may bring suit against the person in the superior court of any county where the violation occurs or is threatened, to restrain the person from continuing the violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. Upon the filing of the suit, summons issued to the person may be directed to the sheriff or his or her deputies. In the suit, the court has jurisdiction to grant to the supervisor such prohibitory and mandatory injunctions either preliminary or final as the facts may warrant.

(b) If the supervisor fails to bring suit to enjoin a violation or threatened violation of any provision of this article, or any rule, regulation or order of the supervisor within 10 days after receipt of written request to do so by any person who is or will be adversely affected by the violation, the person making the request may bring suit in the person’s own behalf to restrain the violation or threatened violation in any court in which the supervisor might have brought suit. If in the suit, the court should hold that injunctive relief should be granted, then the supervisor shall be made a party and shall be substituted for the person who brought the suit, and the injunction shall be issued as if the supervisor had at all times been the plaintiff.

(c) No civil action for damages shall lie against any person for the violation of this article or any rule, regulation or order of the supervisor, except against an owner of the working interest, and particularly no such suit or action shall lie against any lessor, royalty owner, contractor or purchaser of the oil and gas, and no such suit or action shall lie against an owner of the working interest, except suits or actions for damages occurring subsequent to the entry of an order or decision of the supervisor which result from a failure to comply with the order or decision.

(d) If the supervisor brings a suit or action pursuant to this article, no defendant or intervenor shall be permitted to cross-complain or otherwise bring an action in the same proceeding against any other person for damages or for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 350.)
-------------------------------------------

3345.

No finding or determination made by the supervisor under the provisions of this article or by any court in proceedings involving the enforcement or review of the orders of the supervisor shall be received in evidence or be binding upon any person in any other proceeding not directly related to the making, enforcement or review of the orders of the supervisor under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3346.

The provisions of this article shall supersede any conflicting provisions contained in any legislative grant of tide and submerged lands, or in any law amendatory or supplemental thereto, or any other laws affecting such granted lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3347.

If any section, subsection, subdivision, sentence or clause of this article is adjudged to be unconstitutional or invalid, such adjudication shall not affect the validity of the remaining portion of this article. It is hereby declared that this article would have been passed, and each division, section, subsection, subdivision, sentence or clause thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more sections, subsections, subdivisions, sentences or clauses might be adjudged to be unconstitutional, or for any other reason invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Appeals and Review [3350. - 3359.]

3350.

(a) The operator of a well or a production facility to whom the supervisor or district deputy has issued an order pursuant to this chapter may file a notice of appeal from that order. The notice of appeal shall be in writing and shall be filed with the director. The operator shall file the appeal within 10 days of the service of the order, or within 10 days of the posting of a copy of an order made pursuant to Section 3308. Failure of the operator to file an appeal from the order within the 10-day period shall be a waiver by the operator of its rights to challenge the order. If the order, other than an order made pursuant to Section 3308, is served by mail, the time for responding shall be determined as provided in Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) (1) The filing of a written notice of appeal shall operate as a stay of the order, except when an order is issued as an emergency order pursuant to Section 3226. If the order is an emergency order, the operator shall immediately perform whatever work is required by the order to alleviate the emergency or shall permit the agents appointed by the supervisor to perform that work. If the order is an emergency order to cease injection, then the operator shall cease injection as soon as it is safe to do so.

(2) If an emergency order is set aside or modified on appeal, the supervisor shall refund the reasonable costs incurred by the operator for whatever work is not required by the set-aside or modified order or shall not impose costs for work performed by the supervisor or the supervisor’s agents if the work is excluded from the modified order or the order is set
 aside. Only the costs of work performed shall be refunded, and there shall be no reimbursement for lost profits or increased production costs.

(3) (A) The costs to be refunded pursuant to paragraph (2) by the supervisor shall be determined in a hearing before the director after the exhaustion of appeals. The operator shall have the burden of proving the amount of costs to be refunded.

(B) A determination by the director as to the amount of costs to be refunded pursuant to paragraph (2) may be appealed by the operator pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3354.

(4) If the operator believes that it will be irretrievably injured by the performance of the work required to alleviate the emergency pending the outcome of the appeal, the operator may seek an order from the appropriate superior court restraining the
 enforcement of the order pending the outcome of the appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 274, Sec. 4.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3351.

(a) A hearing shall be provided in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code only in an appeal from an order in the following circumstances:

(1) Issued pursuant to a Section 3237 finding that the operator’s wells are deserted and should be plugged and abandoned.

(2) Imposing civil penalties totaling more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(3) Rescinding an entire injection project approval for a project that has already commenced.

(4) Imposing a
 life-of-well bond or a life-of-production facility bond.

(b) An order issued pursuant to Section 3225 shall satisfy the substantive requirements of an accusation pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code and may be filed when scheduling a formal hearing in accordance with this chapter and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. All applicable formal hearing deadlines do not commence until a formal hearing is scheduled. When scheduling a formal hearing after an appeal from an order under this chapter, the supervisor is not required to send a Notice of Defense statement and the operator is not required to request a hearing.

(c) For an appeal of an order that is not described in subdivision (a), a hearing shall be conducted by the director in accordance with Sections 3352 and 3353.

(d) For an appeal of an order that is described in subdivision (a) and is also an emergency order, a hearing shall be conducted by the director in accordance with Sections 3352 and 3353 for the limited purpose of considering the reasonableness of the supervisor’s determination that an emergency exists. All other penalties and requirements imposed by the order shall be considered at a hearing provided in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 274, Sec. 5.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3352.

(a) A hearing conducted by the director shall adhere to the following:

(1) When an order is not issued as an emergency order, within 30 days from the date of the service of the notice of appeal, the director shall provide to the operator notice of the time and place of the hearing. The hearing shall take place within 30 days after the date of the director’s notice. The notice shall inform the operator that the director may extend the date of the hearing for up to 60 days for good cause upon his or her own motion, or an application of the operator or the supervisor.

(2) When an order has been issued as an emergency order, within 10 days from the date of the
 service of the notice of appeal, the director shall provide to the operator notice of the time and place of the hearing. The hearing shall take place within 20 days after the date of the director’s notice. The notice shall inform the operator that the director may extend the date of the hearing for up to 30 days for good cause upon his or her own motion, or an application of the operator or the supervisor.

(b) The director shall conduct the hearing within the district where the majority of the wells or production facilities that are the subject of the order are located, or the hearing may be conducted at a location outside of that district upon application of the operator. The hearing shall be reported by a stenographic reporter.

(c) The notice of hearing shall inform the operator of its right to file a written answer to the charges no later than 10 days before the date of the
 hearing. The notice also shall inform the operator that it has the right to present oral and documentary evidence at the hearing.

(d) Upon a verified and timely petition of the operator, the director may order the testimony of a witness at the hearing. The petition shall be served upon the director and the other party within five days after the filing of an appeal and shall set forth the name and address of the witness whose testimony is requested, to the extent known; a showing of the materiality of the testimony; and a showing that the witness cannot be compelled to testify absent an order of the director. The supervisor may file an opposition to the petition within five days after the petition is served. The director shall either deny or grant the petition within 10 days after receipt of the petition. Upon granting a petition, the director shall issue a subpoena pursuant to Section 3357 compelling the testimony of the witness at the hearing.
 Obtaining subpoenas may be considered good cause to extend the date of the hearing under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a).

(e) The director may convert a hearing pursuant to this section to a formal hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The operator makes a showing satisfactory to the director that the order being appealed is likely to result in termination of an established oil or gas producing or injection operation.

(2) It appears to the director that the hearing will involve complex evidentiary or procedural issues that will cause more than minimal delay or burdens.

(3) The operator and the supervisor
 agree and stipulate to convert the hearing to a formal hearing.

(f) The conversion of a hearing pursuant to this section to a formal hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Article 15 (commencing with Section 11470.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. If a hearing for an appeal of an emergency order is converted to a formal hearing, the supervisor shall endeavor to schedule and notice a formal emergency hearing as soon as reasonably possible and, notwithstanding Section 11517 of the Government Code, the director shall only have 30 days from receipt of the administrative law judge’s proposed emergency hearing decision to act as prescribed in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11517 of the Government Code.

(g) The director or his or her designee shall permit inconspicuous personal
 recording devices to be used by persons during a hearing pursuant to this section to make sound recordings as personal notes of the proceedings. A person proposing to use a recording device shall provide advance notice to the director or his or her designee. The recordings may not be used for any purpose other than as personal notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 274, Sec. 6.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3353.

(a) Within 30 days after the close of a hearing conducted by the director, the director shall issue a written decision affirming, setting aside, or modifying the order from which the appeal was taken. The director’s written decision shall be based upon the preponderance of the evidence and shall set forth the director’s factual findings, legal conclusions, and rationale for the result. The director may extend the 30-day period for issuing the written decision if the extension is agreed to by the operator.

(b) The director shall file the written decision with the supervisor and serve it on the operator as soon as the decision is complete, at which time the decision shall be deemed final. The director’s
 decision shall supersede the order of the supervisor from which the appeal was made. If the director affirms or modifies the order, the director shall retain jurisdiction until the operator completes the work required to be performed by the order.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 264, Sec. 10.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

3354.

(a) Following a hearing conducted by the director pursuant to Sections 3352 and 3353 or subdivision (b) of Section 3350, the operator may obtain judicial review of the decision of the director by filing a petition for writ of administrative mandamus in the superior court of the county where the division’s district office from which the order was issued is located. The operator shall file the petition within 30 days after the date the operator was served with the decision.

(b) Following a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the operator may obtain judicial review of the decision pursuant to Section 11523
 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 264, Sec. 12.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

3355.

When an operator seeks judicial review of a decision of the director, including a decision following a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the court shall hear the cause on the record before the director or an administrative law judge. New or additional evidence shall not be introduced in court. The court’s inquiry shall extend to whether the director acted without or in excess of jurisdiction, whether there was a fair hearing, and whether there is any prejudicial abuse of discretion. Abuse of discretion is established if the administrative proceeding has not been conducted in the manner required by law, the decision is not supported by the findings, or the findings are not supported by
 substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 264, Sec. 14.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

3356.

(a) If the operator does not appeal an order, if the operator does not timely seek judicial review of a decision affirming or modifying an order within the time provided in Section 3354, or if the operator has timely sought and obtained judicial review and the court has affirmed the decision, then any charge, including penalty and interest, that the decision permits the supervisor to impose on the operator for work performed by the supervisor or the supervisor’s agents, and any civil penalties imposed under Section 3236.5 shall constitute a state tax lien against the real and personal property of the operator pursuant to Section 3423.

(b) In addition to a state tax lien, the supervisor may apply to the appropriate superior
 court for a clerk’s judgment. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final agency order or decision, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered shall have the same force and effect as, and shall be subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 274, Sec. 7.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3357.

(a) In any proceeding before the director, and in any proceeding instituted by the supervisor for the purpose of enforcing or carrying out the provisions of this division, or for the purpose of holding an investigation to ascertain the condition of any well or wells complained of, or which in the opinion of the supervisor may reasonably be presumed to be improperly located, drilled, operated, maintained, or conducted, the supervisor and the director shall have the power to administer oaths and may apply to a judge of the superior court of the county in which the proceeding or investigation is pending for subpoenas for witnesses to attend the proceeding or investigation. Upon the application of the supervisor or the director, the judge of the superior court shall assign a case number for the proceeding or investigation, shall issue
 an order prescribing the nature and scope of the proceeding or investigation, and shall retain jurisdiction for the limited purpose of enforcing subpoenas issued in the proceeding or investigation. Upon the assigning of a case number, the attorney of record for the supervisor or director may issue subpoenas directing witnesses to attend the proceeding or investigation, and those persons shall be required to produce, when directed, all records, surveys, documents, books, or accounts in the witness’ custody or under the witness’ control; except that no person shall be required to attend upon the proceeding unless the person resides within the same county or within 100 miles of the place of attendance. The attorney of record for the supervisor or the director may in that case cause the depositions of witnesses residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil actions in superior courts of this state under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of
 Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and may issue subpoenas compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, surveys, documents, books, or accounts at designated places within the limits prescribed in this section.

(b) (1) In conducting a proceeding or investigation specified in subdivision (a), the supervisor or director may require an owner or operator to furnish, under penalty of perjury, technical or monitoring reports that the supervisor or director requires. The burden, including costs, of any report shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the report and the benefits to be obtained from the report. In requiring a report, the supervisor or director shall explain in writing to the owner or operator the need for the report, and shall identify the rationale that supports requiring that owner or operator to provide the report.

(2) When requested by the owner or operator furnishing the report, neither the division nor the department shall make available to the public for inspection portions of a report that might disclose trade secrets, well data granted confidential status pursuant to Section 3234, or other confidential or privileged information. The division or department shall make that confidential or privileged information available to other public agencies as needed for regulatory purposes and in accordance with a written agreement with the other public agency regarding the sharing of the information.

(c) In conducting a proceeding or investigation pursuant to subdivision (a), the supervisor or director, or his or her inspector, may inspect the well site or production facilities of any owner or operator to ascertain whether the owner or operator is complying with the requirements of, or authorized by, this division. The inspection shall be made with
 the consent of the owner or operator or, if consent is withheld, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to the procedure set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In the event of an emergency affecting the public health or safety, an inspection may be performed without consent or a warrant. This subdivision is in addition to any other inspection authority granted or authorized by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 204.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3358.

Witnesses shall be entitled to receive the fees and mileage fixed by law in civil causes, payable from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 15.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3359.

In case of the failure or neglect on the part of any person to comply with any order of the supervisor or the director, or any subpoena, or upon the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regarding which he may lawfully be interrogated, or upon refusal or neglect to appear and attend at any proceeding or hearing on the day specified, after having received a written notice of not less than 10 days prior to such proceeding or hearing, or upon his failure, refusal, or neglect to produce books, papers, or documents as demanded in the order or subpoena upon such day, such failure, refusal, or neglect shall constitute a misdemeanor. Each day’s further failure, refusal, or neglect is a separate and distinct offense.

The district attorney of the county in which the proceeding, hearing, or investigation is to be held, shall prosecute any person guilty of violating this section by continuous prosecution until the person appears or attends or produces such books, papers, or documents, or complies with the subpoena or order of the supervisor or the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 765.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Assessment and Collection of Charges [3400. - 3434.]

3400.

The charges directed to be levied by this article are necessary in the exercise of the police power of the State and to provide a means by which to supervise and protect deposits of oil and gas within the State, in which deposits the people of the State have a primary and supreme interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3401.

(a) The proceeds of charges levied, assessed, and collected pursuant to this article upon the properties of every person operating or owning an interest in the production of a well shall be used exclusively for the support and maintenance of the department charged with the supervision of oil and gas operations, for the State Water Resources Control Board and the regional water quality control boards for their activities related to oil and gas operations that may affect water resources, and for the support of the State Air Resources Board and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment for their activities related to oil and gas operations that may affect air quality, public health, or public safety.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the proceeds of charges levied, assessed, and collected pursuant to this article upon the properties of every person operating or owning an interest in the production of a well undergoing a well stimulation treatment, may be used by public entities, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, for all costs associated with both of the following:

(1) Well stimulation treatments, including rulemaking and scientific studies required to evaluate the treatment, inspections, any air and water quality sampling, monitoring, and testing performed by public entities.

(2) The costs of the State Water Resources Control Board and the regional water quality control boards in carrying out their responsibilities pursuant to Section 3160 and Section 10783 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 341, Sec. 5.   (SB 840)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3402.

There shall annually be imposed upon the person operating each oil well in this state, or owning royalty or other interests in respect to the production from the well, a charge which shall be payable to the Treasurer and which shall be computed at a uniform rate per barrel of oil produced from the well for the preceding calendar year. The charge shall be apportioned among all of those persons in fractional amounts proportionate to their respective fractional interests in respect to the production of the well, but the whole of the charge shall be payable by the operator, who shall withhold their respective proportionate shares of the charge from the amounts otherwise payable or deliverable to the owners of royalty or other interests. In the case of a penalty for late payment as provided in Section 3420, no apportionment shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

3403.

There shall annually be imposed upon the person operating each gas well in this state, or owning royalty or other interests with respect to the production from the well, a charge, which shall be payable to the Treasurer, based upon the amount of gas produced in the preceding calendar year, other than gas which is used for recycling or otherwise in oil-producing operations, and which shall be computed at a uniform rate per ten thousand cubic feet. The charge shall be apportioned among all of those persons in fractional amounts proportionate to their respective fractional interests with respect to the production of the well, but the whole of the charge shall be payable by the operator, who shall withhold the respective proportionate shares of the charge from the amounts otherwise payable or deliverable to the owners of royalty or other interests. In the case of a penalty for a late payment as provided in Section 3420, no apportionment shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

3403.5.

(a) The Legislature finds that there are underground storage facilities for gas that utilize depleted or partially depleted oil or gas reservoirs. Purchased gas, usually from out of state, is injected for storage and withdrawn during peak load periods. The supervisor is required to maintain surveillance over these facilities to ensure that the original reserves are not lost, that drilling of new wells is conducted properly, and that no damage occurs to the environment by reason of injection and withdrawal of gas.

(b) In order to help support the regulatory effort of the supervisor, there shall be imposed an annual charge on operators of underground gas storage facilities to defray
 the regulatory costs incurred by the state in conducting the activities described in subdivision (a). Each underground gas storage facility operator shall pay a proportionate share of the total regulatory costs projected for each fiscal year based on the field capacity and number of wells for each underground gas storage facility. For each underground gas storage facility, the portion owed by the operator shall be computed by multiplying the operator’s field capacity by the number of the operator’s wells, and dividing that product by the statewide sum across all underground gas storage facilities of the product of the field capacity of each individual underground gas storage facility multiplied by the number of wells at that facility.

(c) In order to defray the costs of the response effort of the division in the event of a large, uncontrolled release of gas from an underground storage facility that poses a significant present or potential
 hazard to public health and safety, property, or to the environment, there shall be an additional charge imposed entirely on the operator of the underground storage facility at which the uncontrolled leak or release of gas occurred. The charge shall be in the amount of the total directly associated costs incurred by the division in the previous calendar year in the course of responding to the release, including personnel hours, travel expenses, contracting costs, and any other directly associated costs incurred by the division.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Field capacity” means the total gas storage capacity, including base and working gas capacity, of an underground gas storage facility, in cubic feet.

(2) “Wells” means all wells associated with an
 underground gas storage facility except those that have been plugged and abandoned pursuant to Section 3208 before the preceding calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 673, Sec. 4.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3403.6.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “gravity-based energy storage well” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 3190.

(b) To support the regulatory effort of the supervisor, there shall be imposed an annual charge on operators of gravity-based energy storage wells to defray the regulatory costs incurred by the state in maintaining surveillance of these wells, ensuring that testing is conducted properly, and ensuring that no damage occurs to the environment by reason of conversion. Each gravity-based energy storage well operator shall pay a proportionate share of the total regulatory costs for each fiscal year based on the operator’s number of gravity-based energy storage wells. For each gravity-based energy storage well, the portion
 owed by the operator shall be computed by dividing the statewide sum of reasonably incurred regulatory costs across all gravity-based energy source wells by the number of gravity-based energy storage wells.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 2.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3404.
